District of Columbia, session 26, B26-0052.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE COUNCIL OF THE DISTRICT OF COLUMBIA, That this
36 act may be cited as the “Evidence-Based Gun Violence Reduction and Prevention Act of 2025”.
37 TABLE OF CONTENTS
38 TITLE I. GROUP VIOLENCE INTERVENTION INITIATIVE........................................... 2
39 TITLE II. CIVILIAN INVESTIGATORS AT THE METROPOLITAN POLICE
40 DEPARTMENT............................................................................................................................. 4

41 TITLE III. BIANNUAL REPEAT VIOLENT OFFENDER REPORT................................... 6
42 TITLE IV. ADDRESSING CRIMINAL BLIGHT IN THE DISTRICT.................................. 8
43 TITLE V. MEDICAID FUNDING FOR COMMUNITY VIOLENCE PREVENTION
44 SERVICES................................................................................................................................... 11
45 TITLE VI. FISCAL IMPACT STATEMENT; EFFECTIVE DATE..................................... 14
46 TITLE I. GROUP VIOLENCE INTERVENTION INITIATIVE.
47 Sec. 101. Establishment of group violence intervention initiative.
48 There is established the District of Columbia Group Violence Intervention Initiative
49 (“Initiative”). The purpose of the Initiative is to address gun violence in the District by focusing
50 law enforcement activities on individuals and groups committing acts of gun violence,
51 coordinating enforcement activities across law enforcement agencies, providing robust social
52 services and supports to individuals willing to cease criminal activity, and proactively engaging
53 residents in communities impacted by gun violence.
54 Sec. 102. Group violence intervention governing board; strategy and implementation
55 team.
56 (a) To implement the Initiative, there is established a:
57 (1) Group Violence Intervention Initiative Governing Board (“Governing Board”).
58 The Governing Board shall have final decision-making authority and provide resources to the
59 strategy and implementation team as deemed necessary. The Governing Board shall include:
60 (A) The Mayor;
61 (B) The City Administrator; and
62 (C) The Chair of the Committee on Judiciary and Public Safety.
2

63 (2) Strategy and Implementation Team, which shall report to the Governing Board
64 on a regular basis to provide progress updates and request resources as needed. The Strategy and
65 Implementation Team shall handle the daily operations of the Initiative, including making key
66 decisions, developing strategies, securing resources, and continuously monitoring results.
67 (A) The Strategy and Implementation Team shall be composed of 12
68 members. Members of the Strategy and Implementation Team shall include:
69 (i) The Director of the Office of Gun Violence Prevention, who
70 shall serve as the Executive Director;
71 (ii) The Chief of the Metropolitan Police Department, who shall
72 serve as co-chair;
73 (iii) The Executive Director of the Office of Neighborhood Safety
74 and Engagement;
75 (iv) The United States Attorney for the District of Columbia;
76 (v) The Attorney General for the District of Columbia;
77 (vi) The Director of the Court Services and Offender Supervision
78 Agency;
79 (vii) The Director of the Pretrial Services Agency;
80 (viii) Two lieutenants from the Metropolitan Police Department,
81 selected by the Chief;
82 (ix) Two representatives from community-based organizations with
83 a demonstrated history of providing social services and supports to individuals who are at high
84 risk of engaging in gun violence;
3

85 (x) A researcher with expertise in law enforcement policies and
86 practices whose work has been published in peer-reviewed journals.
87 Sec. 103. Implementation plan.
88 (a) The Strategy and Implementation Team shall develop an implementation plan for the
89 initiative. The implementation plan shall, at a minimum, include:
90 (1) How the Initiative will identify individuals and groups responsible for or at
91 high risk of engaging in gun violence;
92 (2) Key stakeholders, including community members and service providers, who
93 will be engaged as part of the initiative, including proposed engagement strategies;
94 (3) Protocols for conducting call-ins of individuals who may be subject to focused
95 enforcement efforts;
96 (4) How the needs of individuals identified by the Strategy and Implementation
97 Team pursuant to paragraph (1) will be assessed and what services will be offered to these
98 individuals;
99 (5) Proposed performance measures and data that will be utilized to track the
100 outcomes of the initiative; and
101 (6) Resources necessary to effectively implement the Initiative.
102 (b) The implementation plan shall be submitted to the Governing Board for approval
103 within six months of the effective date of this title.
104 Sec. 104. Reporting.
105 (a) On a quarterly basis, the Mayor shall provide a report to the Council that contains data
106 and analysis of performance measures developed by the Strategy and Implementation Team,
107 along with any other information deemed relevant.
4

108 TITLE II. CIVILIAN INVESTIGATORS AT THE METROPOLITAN POLICE
109 DEPARTMENT.
110 Sec. 201. Civilian investigators.
111 (a) The Metropolitan Police Department is hereby authorized to employ and allow
112 civilian personnel to investigate the following types of incidents when there is no expected
113 suspect contact:
114 (1) Commercial burglary;
115 (2) Residential burglary;
116 (3) Motor vehicle theft;
117 (4) Theft;
118 (5) Forgery;
119 (6) Fraud; and
120 (7) Other property crime investigations.
121 (b) In addition to the incidents listed in subsection (a) of this section, civilian personnel
122 may be employed to investigate cold cases.
123 (c) All of the following shall apply to investigators authorized pursuant to subsection (a)
124 of this section:
125 (1) The Metropolitan Police Department shall establish minimum standards for
126 employment as an investigator;
127 (2) Each investigator shall attend a training program designed by the Metropolitan
128 Police Department;
129 (3) Each investigator shall be issued credentials by the Metropolitan Police
130 Department identifying the individual as a civilian investigator;
5

131 (4) Investigators shall be issued a uniform that is substantially different in color
132 and style from that of a sworn officer of the Metropolitan Police Department. The uniform shall
133 have patches that clearly identify the individual as a civilian investigator, and the individual’s
134 name shall be clearly displayed on the uniform. Investigators shall not be issued badges;
135 (5) Any vehicles issued to or used by an investigator shall not bear markings or
136 symbols that identify the vehicle as a police cruiser or patrol vehicle. The vehicle may have
137 emergency equipment and lights installed but shall not use blue lights in any manner or form;
138 (6) Investigators shall not be issued a firearm; and
139 (7) Investigators shall have no authority to arrest.
140 (c) The employment or use of investigators as authorized pursuant to subsection (a) of
141 this section shall not supplant or replace existing sworn law enforcement personnel or otherwise
142 cause a reduction in the number of sworn law enforcement officers employed by the
143 Metropolitan Police Department.
144 TITLE III. BIANNUAL REPEAT VIOLENT OFFENDER REPORT.
145 Sec. 301. Biannual repeat offender report from the Sentencing Commission.
146 (a) On January 1, 2025 and every six months thereafter, the Sentencing Commission of
147 the District of Columbia shall publish a repeat violent offender report that contains the following:
148 (1) A de-identified list of repeat violent offenders arrested in the prior year. The
149 list shall include:
150 (A) The date of the arrest;
151 (B) The top charge against the offender;
152 (C) Whether the arrest was papered;
153 (D) For arrests that were papered, the current disposition of the case;
6

154 (E) The number of prior arrests and convictions for crimes of violence
155 within the last five years, and the specific charges the individual was arrested and/or convicted of
156 for each arrest and conviction;
157 (2) An analysis that shows:
158 (A) The number and percentage of arrests and cases filed with the
159 Superior Court in the prior year involving repeat violent offenders; and
160 (B) The disposition of cases filed with the Superior Court in the year
161 before the prior year; and
162 (3) Any other information the Commission deems relevant or necessary.
163 (b) The report required pursuant to subsection (a) of this section shall be publicly
164 accessible through the Commission’s website.
165 (c) For purposes of this section, the term:
166 (1) “Crime of violence” means the following crimes when committed with a
167 firearm:
168 (A) Aggravated assault;
169 (B) Assault with a dangerous weapon;
170 (C) Carjacking,
171 (D) Assault with intent to kill;
172 (E) Kidnapping;
173 (F) Manslaughter;
174 (G) Murder; or
175 (H) Robbery.
7

176 (2) “Repeat violent offender” means a person who has been arrested for a crime of
177 violence, as defined in paragraph (1) of this subsection, two or more times in the previous five
178 years.
179 TITLE IV. ADDRESSING CRIMINAL BLIGHT IN THE DISTRICT.
180 Sec. 401. Definitions.
181 For purposes of this title, the term:
182 (a) “Controlled substance” shall have the same meaning as § 48–901.02(4).
183 (b) “Corrective action” means:
184 (1) Taking specific actions with respect to the buildings or structures on the
185 property that are reasonably expected to abate criminal blight on such real property, including the
186 removal, repair, or the securing of any building, wall, structure, or lot; or
187 (2) Changing specific policies, practices, or procedures of the real property owner
188 that are reasonably expected to abate criminal blight on real property.
189 (c) “Criminal blight” means a condition existing on real property that endangers the
190 public health or safety of residents of the city and is caused by:
191 (1) The regular presence of, or use of property by, persons illegally possessing,
192 manufacturing, or distributing controlled substances; or
193 (2) Repeated discharging of a firearm within any building, dwelling, structure, or
194 lot.
195 (d) “Owner” means the record owner of the real property.
196 (e) “Real property” means real property as defined under § 47-802(1).
197 Sec. 402. Corrective action of criminal blight.
8

198 (a)(1) Whenever the owner of any real property in the District of Columbia shall fail or
199 refuse, after the service of reasonable notice pursuant to subsection (b), to correct criminal blight
200 as identified by the Mayor, the Mayor is authorized to cause such condition to be corrected,
201 assess the fair market value of the correction of the condition or the actual cost of the correction,
202 whichever is higher, and all expenses incident thereto as a tax against the property on which the
203 criminal blight existed or arose.
204 (2) The Mayor may utilize funds from § 42–3131.01(b)(1)(A) for corrective
205 actions made pursuant to paragraph (1) of this subsection.
206 (b) The Mayor shall send a notice to the owner of the real property which:
207 (1) Describes the nature of the criminal blight at the real property;
208 (2) Describes the corrective actions that the owner is being requested to take to
209 remediate criminal blight;
210 (3) Advises that the owner has 30 days from the date of receipt of the notice to
211 undertake corrective action to abate the criminal blight;
212 (4) States that failure to take corrective actions pursuant to the notice may result
213 in the District commencing corrective actions, the costs of which will be assessed as a tax against
214 the property.
215 (c) The Mayor may provide an owner with an additional 30 days to comply with the
216 notice issued in subsection (b) of this section if:
217 (1) The owner demonstrates that he or she is making a good-faith effort to
218 comply; and
219 (2) The owner provides sufficient evidence that the inability to comply within 30
220 days of receipt of the notice is outside of his or her control.
9

221 (d) A copy of the notice sent to the owner pursuant to subsection (b) of this section shall
222 be provided to the Advisory Neighborhood Commission in which the property is located.
223 (e) If an owner takes timely corrective action as prescribed in the notice in subsection (b)
224 of this section, the Mayor shall deem the criminal blight abated and shall promptly provide
225 written notice to the owner that the criminal blight is abated.
226 (f) If an owner, in good faith, takes corrective action, and despite having taken such
227 action, the specific criminal blight identified in the notice provided pursuant to subsection (b) of
228 this section persists, the owner shall be deemed in compliance.
229 Sec. 403. Prioritization of properties.
230 (a) The Mayor shall develop a list of properties at which criminal blight exists. The list
231 shall be used to prioritize properties for the purposes of sending notices and commencing
232 corrective action pursuant to section 402 of this title.
233 (b) The list developed pursuant to subsection (a) of this section shall prioritize properties
234 according to the severity and frequency of criminal blight at the real property. The nature and
235 severity of criminal blight may be measured by:
236 (1) The number of calls for service to police;
237 (2) Law enforcement intelligence information; or
238 (3) The number of arrests of individuals occupying or present at the property.
239 Sec. 404. Reporting of corrective actions.
240 On an annual basis, the Mayor shall provide the Council of the District of Columbia and
241 the Attorney General of the District of Columbia with a report that contains the following
242 information:
10

243 (1) A list of properties at which the Mayor identified criminal blight and provided
244 notice to the owner;
245 (2) A brief description of the criminal blight at each property in the list;
246 (3) A brief description of the corrective actions requested by the Mayor at each
247 property on the list;
248 (4) Whether the owner of the real property took timely corrective action; and
249 (5) If the owner did not take timely corrective action, the date on which the
250 District commenced corrective action and the cost of that corrective action.
251 Sec. 405. Availability of other remedies.
252 The provisions of this title shall not limit the availability of other remedies under the law.
253 TITLE V. MEDICAID FUNDING FOR COMMUNITY VIOLENCE PREVENTION
254 SERVICES.
255 Sec. 501. Definitions.
256 For purposes of this title, the term:
257 (a) “Community violence” means intentional acts of interpersonal violence committed by
258 individuals who are not intimately related to the victim.
259 (b) “Community violence prevention services” means evidence-informed, trauma-
260 informed, culturally responsive, supportive, and non-psychotherapeutic services provided by a
261 qualified violence prevention professional for the purpose of promoting improved health
262 outcomes, trauma recovery, and positive behavioral change, preventing injury recidivism and
263 reducing the likelihood that individuals who are victims of violence will commit or promote
264 violence themselves. “Violence prevention services” may include the provision of peer support
265 and counseling, mentorship, conflict mediation, crisis intervention, targeted case management,
11

266 referrals to licensed healthcare professionals or service providers, community and school support
267 services, and patient education or screening services to victims of community violence.
268 (c) “Director” means the Director of the Department of Healthcare Finance.
269 (d) “Prevention professional” means an individual who works in programs aimed to
270 address specific patient needs.
271 (e) “Qualified violence prevention professional” means a prevention professional who
272 meets the qualifications and conditions of section 503 of this title.
273 Sec. 502. Medicaid plan amendment.
274 (a) Within 60 days of the effective date of this title, the Director shall apply to the federal
275 government for approval of an amendment to the Medicaid state plan to make community
276 violence prevention services available, to the extent permitted by federal law, to any Medicaid
277 beneficiary who has:
278 (1) Been exposed to community violence;
279 (2) A personal history of injury sustained as a result of an act of community
280 violence; and
281 (3) Been referred by a licensed health care provider or social services provider to
282 receive community violence prevention services from a qualified violence prevention
283 professional after such provider determines such beneficiary to be at elevated risk of a violent
284 injury or retaliation resulting from another act of community violence.
285 (b) The Director shall seek any federal approvals necessary to implement this title,
286 including any federal waivers by the federal Centers for Medicare and Medicaid Services.
12

287 (c) Once federal approval has been applied for pursuant to subsection (a) of this section,
288 the Director shall, in consultation with violence intervention organizations and community-based
289 and hospital-based violence prevention programs:
290 (1) Issue guidance on the use of community violence prevention services for
291 beneficiaries who access these services under the medical assistance program; and
292 (2) Determine the maximum allowable rates for community violence prevention
293 services based on the medical assistance program fee-for-service outpatient rates for the same or
294 similar services or any other data deemed reliable and relevant by the Director.
295 Sec. 503. Qualified violence prevention professionals.
296 (a) Within 90 days of the effective date of this title, the Department of Health shall, in
297 consultation with the Director of the Office of Gun Violence Prevention, approve at least one
298 governmental or nongovernmental accrediting body with expertise in community violence
299 prevention services to review and approve training and certification programs for qualified
300 violence prevention professionals. The accrediting body shall approve programs that such body
301 determines, in its discretion, will adequately prepare individuals to provide community violence
302 prevention services to individuals who are victims of community violence. Such programs shall
303 include at least 35 hours of training and address the following:
304 (1) The effects of trauma and violence;
305 (2) The basics of trauma-informed care;
306 (3) Community violence prevention strategies, including conflict mediation and
307 retaliation prevention related to community violence, case management, and advocacy practices;
308 and
13

309 (4) Patient privacy and the federal Health Insurance Portability and Accountability
310 Act of 1996 (P.L. 104-191).
311 (b) Any prevention professional seeking certification as a qualified violence prevention
312 professional shall:
313 (1) Complete at least six months of full-time equivalent experience in providing
314 community violence prevention services or youth development services through employment,
315 volunteer work, or as part of an internship experience;
316 (2) Complete the training and certification program approved by the Department
317 of Health pursuant to subsection (a) of this section for qualified violence prevention
318 professionals;
319 (3) Complete annually at least four of continuing education by a provider
320 approved by the Department of Health in the field of community violence prevention services;
321 and
322 (4) Satisfy any other requirements established by the Department of Health for
323 certification as a qualified violence prevention professional.
324 (c) Any entity that employs or contracts with a qualified violence prevention professional
325 to provide community violence prevention services shall:
326 (1) Maintain documentation that the qualified violence prevention professional
327 has met all of the qualifications and conditions of subsection (b) of this section; and
328 (2) Ensure that the qualified violence prevention professional is providing
329 services in compliance with any applicable standards of care, rules, regulations, and laws.
330 TITLE VI. FISCAL IMPACT STATEMENT; EFFECTIVE DATE.
331 Sec. 601. Fiscal impact statement.
14

332 The Council adopts the fiscal impact statement in the committee report as the fiscal
333 impact statement required by section 4a of the General Legislative Procedures Act of 1975,
334 approved October 16, 2006 (120 Stat. 2038; D.C. Official Code § 1-301.47a).
335 Sec. 602. Effective date.
336 This act shall take effect following approval by the Mayor (or in the event of veto by the
337 Mayor, action by the Council to override the veto), a 60-day period of congressional review as
338 provided in section 602(c)(2) of the District of Columbia Home Rule Act, approved December
339 24, 1973 (87 Stat. 813; D.C. Official Code § 1-206.02(c)(2)), and publication in the District of
340 Columbia Register.
15